Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For public use, see 11 AAC 12.

For special park use permits, 11 AAC 18.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares and Playgrounds, §§ 1-19

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, § 56.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 251, 259-264.

Construction of highway through park as violation of use to which park property may be devoted. 60 A.L.R.3d 581.

State’s liability for personal injuries from criminal attacks in state park. 59 ALR4th 1236.

Sec. 41.21.010.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

41.21.010

—

41.21.040

to foster the growth and development of a system of parks and recreational facilities and opportunities in the state, for the general health, welfare, education, and enjoyment of its citizens and for the attraction of visitors to the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 158 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.010. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.020.
Duties and powers of Department of Natural Resources; limitations.

The department shall

develop a continuing plan for the conservation and maximum use in the public interest of the scenic, historic, archaeologic, scientific, biological, and recreational resources of the state;

plan for and develop a system of state parks and recreational facilities, to be established as the legislature authorizes and directs;

acquire by gift, purchase, or transfer from state or federal agencies, or from individuals, corporations, partnerships, or associations, land necessary, suitable, and proper for roadside, picnic, recreational, or park purposes;

develop, manage, and maintain state parks and recreational areas;

provide for the acquisition, care, management, supervision, improvement, development, extension, and maintenance of public recreational land, and make necessary arrangements, contracts, or commitments for the improvement and development of land acquired under AS

41.21.010

—

41.21.040

; contracting for improvement and development under this paragraph is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code);

adopt, in accordance with this section and AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), regulations governing the use and designating incompatible uses within the boundaries of state park and recreational areas to protect the property and to preserve the peace;

cooperate with the United States and its agencies and local subdivisions of the state to secure the effective supervision, improvement, development, extension, and maintenance of state parks, state monuments, state historical areas, and state recreational areas and secure agreements or contracts for the purpose of AS

41.21.010

—

41.21.040

;

encourage the organization of state public park and recreational activities in the local political subdivisions of the state;

provide for consulting service designed to develop local park and recreation facilities and programs;

provide clearinghouse services for other state agencies concerned with park and recreation matters;

perform other duties as are prescribed by executive order or by law;

maintain memorials to Alaska veterans located in state parks;

adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), regulations governing the use of the Chena River State Recreation Area and designating incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Chena River State Recreation Area in accordance with AS

41.21.490

; and

annually, by the first day of each regular session of the legislature, submit a report to the legislature on each designation of an incompatible use under this chapter, or other action, that prohibits or restricts a traditional means of access in or to a park, area, or preserve established under this chapter for a traditional recreational activity on or within the park, area, or preserve; for each prohibition or restriction, the report must state reasons for the designation of incompatibility or prohibition or restriction of a traditional means of access, the specific area of the prohibition or restriction, and the time period during which the incompatibility or prohibition or restriction is expected to exist; in this paragraph,

“traditional means of access” means those types of transportation on, to, or in the state land, water, or land and water, for which a popular pattern of use has developed; the term includes general or commercial aviation, ballooning, motorized and nonmotorized boating, snowmachining, operation of all-terrain vehicles, mushing, use of pack animals, skiing, snowshoeing, and walking;

“traditional recreational activity” means those personal or commercial types of activities that people may use for sport, exercise, subsistence, or personal enjoyment, including hunting, fishing, trapping, or gathering, and that have historically been conducted as part of an individual, family, or community life pattern on or in the state land, water, or land and water.

In adopting regulations under (a)(6) of this section, the department shall consider whether the use of dogs, horses, and other animals for packing gear, pulling sleds, or for other recreational use is a compatible use within a state park or recreational area.

The department may accept cash and other donations from public or private sources to assist and support the department in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section, the department may not manage as part of a park, area, or preserve established under AS

41.21.110

—

41.21.630

, land, water, or land and water that is not within the boundaries, as designated by the legislature, of the park, area, or preserve.

Except for reasons which create an immediate threat to public safety or as otherwise provided in AS

41.21.110

—

41.21.630

, the department may not close or restrict traditional access to land, water, or land and water, managed under this chapter unless the closure or restriction (1) is limited to a period of not more than 90 days in a calendar year, or (2) is submitted to the legislature for approval at the next regular session of the legislature. A closure or restriction under (1) of this subsection may not be repeated in the subsequent calendar year unless the closure or restriction is approved by the legislature under (2) of this subsection. If the legislature fails to approve a closure or restriction under (2) of this subsection by the last day of that regular session, the closure or restriction ends and cannot be enforced after the last day of that regular session.

History.

(§ 2 ch 158 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 233 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 30 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 78 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1984; am § 40 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 74 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 27 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.020. Renumbered in 1983. Paragraph (a)(13) was enacted as (a)(12) and renumbered in 1981. The present second sentence of AS

41.21.490

was enacted as a part of (a)(13) and transferred in 1981, with minor word changes in (a)(13) of this section. In 1984, “a compatible use” was substituted for “compatible” in subsection (b) to correct a manifest error in ch. 16, SLA 1984.

Cross references. —

For power of the department of military affairs to construct memorials to veterans, see AS

44.35.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For uniform state waterway marking system, see 11 AAC 7, art. 1.

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For jurisdiction and procedure, see 11 AAC 15, art. 1.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For Chugach state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 1.

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

For Kachemak Bay state wilderness park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 3.

For Willow Creek state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 4.

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

For Denali state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 6.

For Caines Head state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 7.

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

For Quartz Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 9.

For Nancy Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 10.

For Captain Cook state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 11.

For Chilkat state park and Point Bridget state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 12.

For Afognak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 13.

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

For Kenai River special management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 17.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 41.21.022.
Discharge of firearms.

The discharge of firearms during lawful hunting, trapping, and fishing is permitted within the boundaries of: (1) Caines Head State Recreation Area; (2) Chena River State Recreation Area; (3) Chugach State Park; (4) Denali State Park; (5) Kachemak Bay State Park; (6) Kachemak Bay State Wilderness Park; (7) Marine Parks established in AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

; (8) Quartz Lake State Recreation Area; and (9) Wood-Tikchik State Park, except that all or part of a state park, marine park, wildlife preserve, or recreation area may be closed to the discharge of firearms by regulations adopted by the department for purposes of public safety or, with the concurrence of the Board of Game, for limited areas of Chugach State Park for public display of local wildlife under AS

41.21.121

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 126 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For Chugach state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 1.

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

For Kachemak Bay state wilderness park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 3.

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

For Denali state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 6.

For Caines Head state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 7.

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

For Quartz Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 9.

For Nancy Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 10.

For Captain Cook state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 11.

For Chilkat state park and Point Bridget state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 12.

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

For Kenai River special management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 17.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

Sec. 41.21.024.
Easements and rights-of-way for access to private land.

The department may grant a public easement or public right-of-way within a state park unit for access to private property if the commissioner determines that the easement or right-of-way

will not unduly affect park resources; and

is in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 172 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.21.020(c)

. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 41.21.025.
Zoning of private land within state parks.

The department may adopt, under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), zoning regulations governing private property within the boundaries of state parks established under this chapter.

Land patented to or under interim conveyance to a regional or village Native corporation under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) that falls within a state park boundary is subject to the zoning regulations provided for under (a) of this section only if the affected regional or village Native corporation consents to or fails to reject the zoning regulations within 60 days from the date they are submitted to the affected corporation.

Uses existing on June 25, 1976 are not affected by zoning regulations adopted after June 25, 1976.

History.

(§ 1 ch 250 SLA 1976; am § 49 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.025. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.026.
Fees for the use of state park system facilities.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the department may charge or collect a fee for

rental of public use cabins or other overnight lodgings;

overnight use of a developed campsite;

special park use permits;

competitive and exclusive commercial use permits;

noncompetitive and nonexclusive commercial use permits;

use of a sewage holding tank dump station;

admission to or guided tours of visitor centers and historic sites;

use of an improved boat ramp in a park facility developed principally for boat launching;

sale of firewood;

use of a developed facility that has developed parking and rest rooms; and

presentation or attendance at programs related to natural or cultural history, outdoor skills or education, or other topics concerned with public use, enjoyment, or understanding of parks.

The department may not charge or collect a fee for an ordinary use of a park unit or the use of a restroom in a park unit.

The department shall establish the fees that may be charged or collected under (a) of this section by regulation. Before setting the fees, the department shall consider at public hearings

the cost to the state of operating the facility or managing the activity;

the normal fees charged for similar facilities or activities by governmental and nongovernmental entities;

the cost of administering a fee collection program for the facility or activity; and

the public interest.

The department shall issue free of charge to disabled veterans of this country an annual state park developed campsite permit. The permit shall allow a disabled veteran to use a state park developed campsite for personal recreation use without a charge or fee under (a)(2) of this section. While utilizing a developed campsite without charge under this subsection, the disabled veteran shall comply with all other statutes or regulations pertaining to the use of the developed campsite. The department shall provide a form for use by a disabled veteran when applying for a permit under this section. Not later than February 1 of each year, the department shall prepare a report on the number of permits issued to disabled veterans under this subsection during the previous calendar year and notify the legislature that the report is available.

In this section, “developed campsite” means a campsite having access to the following public facilities:

restrooms;

a picnic table;

an outdoor cooking facility; and

an approved water source.

In addition to the activities, services, and products for which the department may charge or collect a fee under (a) of this section, the department may sell informational, educational, or promotional merchandise. The department shall price merchandise sold under this subsection in a manner that ensures a reasonable monetary return to the state. To the extent practicable, the department shall sell only merchandise produced or manufactured, including printing, screen printing, and embroidery, in the United States that, subject to AS 36.30, is procured from either an Alaska bidder or a person that employs prisoners under AS

33.30.191(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1991; am § 75 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 77 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 26 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1991, at which time former (d) was relettered as (e).

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 26, SLA 2016 (SB 101), see 2015 Senate Journal 869 — 870.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (a), in the introductory language, deleted “in a park unit” following “collect a fee”, deleted (a)(10), related to sale of merchandise, and made related changes; added (f).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 41.21.027.
Concession contracts in the state park system.

Subject to the restrictions in this section, the state may enter into concession contracts under AS 36 to provide services or construct facilities in a park unit.

The state may not enter into a concession contract under (a) of this section if the proposed contract involves estimated annual gross receipts of more than $100,000, construction of facilities, a term longer than four years, or the provision of services other than those normally provided at similar facilities managed by the state, unless the commissioner finds that the proposed concession contract

will implement the purposes of the park unit and is authorized by the park management plan, if any, that applies to the park unit;

will enhance public use and enjoyment of the park unit while maintaining a high quality environment and the opportunity for high quality recreational experiences;

will provide services or facilities that are not feasible or affordable for the state to provide directly;

will not create unacceptable adverse environmental effects;

is based on a need and desire of the public;

recognizes and accommodates, at no cost, ordinary uses in a park unit;

requires the contractor to hire residents of the state, to the extent available and qualified, when hiring persons to work in the park under the contract;

provides the state with a fair and equitable portion, in money or services, of the contractor’s receipts from the provision of the service or the operation of the facility;

provides that the department retains control over the level of fees and the design and appearance of any facility to be constructed;

encourages the contractor to accommodate visitors with special circumstances, including persons with disabilities, senior citizens, and school children; and

provides that the contract may be terminated if the contractor fails to fulfill the requirements of this section or the contract.

Before bids or proposals are sought or contract negotiations begun for a concession contract under (b) of this section, the commissioner shall

make a preliminary inquiry at the local level to identify community concerns;

if it is appropriate to proceed further, make a preliminary decision that includes the findings required by (b) of this section and

an assessment of existing visitor uses that may be affected by the activities of the contractor;

an assessment of the potential conflicts or significant effects on park wildlife, water, scenic values, or other resources;

an identification of the types of services or goods that the contractor is to provide;

the terms and conditions of the contract;

a determination of whether the contract activity would be more appropriately located on land outside of the park or on private land within the park; and

the views and comments of the park advisory board, when one exists, for the park unit in which the activity is being considered;

after making a preliminary decision under (2) of this subsection,

seek public comment on the preliminary decision through reasonable public notice and, if facilities may be built under the concession contract, conduct public hearings;

after considering the public comment obtained under this paragraph, issue a final decision on whether or not the state will proceed into a concession contract award process.

The commissioner shall provide for public review and comment before a concession contract under this section is renewed or extended.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this section.

A person who enters into a concession contract with the state under this section may not charge or collect a fee for an ordinary use of a park unit or for the use of a restroom in a park unit.

With the exception of guided tours and noncompetitive commercial use permits, concessions or commercial activities are not permitted within the Alaska Chilkat Bald Eagle Preserve.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1987; am § 21 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Sec. 41.21.028.
Definitions.

In AS

41.21.026

—

41.21.028

,

“ordinary use” means a use that is not generally associated with developed facilities, including fishing, hunting, walking, swimming in a natural body of water, picnicking, or automobile parking associated with another ordinary use;

“park unit” means a unit of the state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1987)

Sec. 41.21.030.
Disposition of funds.

All money received from the operation of parks and recreational facilities, including money from concessions, rentals, or donations, shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

In (a) of this section, “money from concessions” means, for a concession contract under AS

41.21.027

, the consideration received by the state from the contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 158 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1987; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.030. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.040.
Division within department.

The commissioner may establish within the department a separate division to perform the functions relative to parks and recreational facilities specified in AS

41.21.010

—

41.21.040

and related or additional functions as are otherwise assigned to the department by law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 158 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.040. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 12, art. 1.

For jurisdiction and procedure, see 11 AAC 15, art. 1.

For procedure, see 11 AAC 16, art. 1.

For national register of historic places, see 11 AAC 16, art. 2.

For procedure, see 11 AAC 17, art. 1.

For park uses, see 11 AAC 18, art. 1.

For Chugach state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 1.

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

For Kachemak Bay state wilderness park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 3.

For Willow Creek state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 4.

For Wood-Tikchik state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 5.

For Denali state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 6.

For Caines Head state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 7.

For Chena River state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 8.

For Quartz Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 9.

For Nancy Lake state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 10.

For Captain Cook state recreation area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 11.

For Chilkat state park and Point Bridget state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 12.

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

For Shuyak Island state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 16.

For Kenai River special management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 17.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

For Eagle preserve land and water restrictions, see 11 AAC 21, art. 1.

For preserve activities; management, see 11 AAC 21, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

A division of parks was established in 1970 under the authority given in this section. The division is now named the division of parks and outdoor recreation.